Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.510

Admission and funding.

The department shall administer a state-supported early childhood education and assistance program to assist eligible children with educational, social, health, nutritional, and cultural development to enhance their opportunity for success in the common school system. Eligible children shall be admitted to approved early childhood programs to the extent that the legislature provides funds, and additional children may be admitted to the extent that grants and contributions from community sources provide sufficient funds for a program equivalent to that supported by state funds. Grants and contributions from community sources shall not supplant the funding required for the full statewide implementation of the early learning program in *RCW 43.215.456.

[ 2017 c 178 s 4; 2006 c 265 s 211; 1994 c 166 s 4; 1988 c 174 s 3; 1985 c 418 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.215.410, 28A.215.120, 28A.34A.030.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.215.456 was recodified as RCW 43.216.556 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 821, effective July 1, 2018.

Intent—2017 c 178: See note following RCW 43.216.080.

Effective date—1994 c 166: See note following RCW 43.216.500.

Findings—1994 c 166; 1988 c 174: See note following RCW 43.216.505.